

10-Q: ISSUER DIRECT CORP - MarketWatch



























































Latest News










Dow

22,020
+4.20
+0.02%






Nasdaq

6,346
-16.69
-0.26%






S&P 500

2,472
-5.09
-0.21%









11:54 A.M. ET


                                  Clothes, meat, champagne and electronics — coming to a vending machine near you
                                





 
11:47 A.M. ET


                                  Congress wouldn’t do it, so Fannie and Freddie reformed themselves
                                





 
11:41 A.M. ET


Updated
      Dow tags the 22,000 mark, also quietly clears the 20-day volatility bands
                                





 
11:33 A.M. ET


Updated
      Treasury yields dip as traders look ahead to payrolls
                                





 
11:29 A.M. ET


Updated
      Oil prices rise as investors focus on U.S. data
                                





 
11:29 A.M. ET


                                  Good news: Employees are starting to get serious about saving for retirement 
                                





 
11:29 A.M. ET


                                  Square stock price target raised to $26 from $18 at Canaccord Genuity
                                





 
11:27 A.M. ET


                                  Trump’s long vacation is needed to stop leaks to the White House press
                                





 
11:16 A.M. ET


                                  GM's Chevy Bolt beats Tesla's Model S in Consumer Reports' range test
                                





 
11:12 A.M. ET


Updated
      Teva shares plummet 18% on cheaper generic drug prices, pulling rivals lower
                                





 
11:10 A.M. ET


                                  Does your kid really want a $200 stuffed giraffe?
                                





 
11:11 A.M. ET


                                  Dovish or hawkish? Bank of England leaves traders confused after ‘Super Thursday’
                                





 
11:03 A.M. ET


                                  Documentary Clip: 'Icarus'
                                





 
11:10 A.M. ET


Updated
      Here’s proof the average U.S. household isn’t the ‘dumb money’
                                





 
11:08 A.M. ET


Updated
      Tesla is a large public company, and Elon Musk must start acting like it
                                





 
11:06 A.M. ET


                                  Voters golfing with President Trump? That was one Scaramucci idea before his exit
                                





 
11:05 A.M. ET


                                  Snap's stock plunges further as rival Instagram Stories celebrates one-year anniversay
                                





 
11:05 A.M. ET


                                  Cheesecake Factory price target cut to $44 from $50 at Instinet
                                





 
11:04 A.M. ET


                                  Cheesecake Factory shares down 3.6% in Thursday trading
                                





 
11:03 A.M. ET


                                  Cheesecake Factory price target cut to $50 from $60 at Canaccord Genuity
                                





 








































Log In
























Home






Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




Get email alerts



         10-Q: ISSUER DIRECT CORP
    








    By

Published: May 4, 2017 5:30 p.m. ET

Share






















































 



 















(EDGAR Online via COMTEX) -- MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS.  The discussion of the financial condition and results of operations of the Company set forth below should be read in conjunction with the consolidated financial statements and related notes thereto included elsewhere in this Form10-Q. This Form10-Q contains forward-looking statements that involve risks and uncertainties. The statements contained in this Form10-Q that are not purely historical are forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27a of the Securities Act and Section 21e of the Exchange Act. When used in this Form10-Q, or in the documents incorporated by reference into this Form10-Q, the words "anticipate," "believe," "estimate," "intend" and "expect" and similar expressions are intended to identify such forward-looking statements. Such forward-looking statements include, without limitation, the statements regarding the Company's strategy, future sales, future expenses, future liquidity and capital resources. All forward-looking statements in this Form10-Q are based upon information available to the Company on the date of this Form10-Q, and the Company assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. The Company's actual results could differ materially from those discussed in this Form10-Q. Factors that could cause or contribute to such differences ("Cautionary Statements") include, but are not limited to, those discussed in Item 1. Business - "Risk Factors" and elsewhere in the Company's Annual Report on Form10-K for the year ended December 31, 2016, which are incorporated by reference herein and in this report. All subsequent written and oral forward-looking statements attributable to the Company, or persons acting on the Company's behalf, are expressly qualified in their entirety by the Cautionary Statements.  Overview  Issuer Direct(TM) Corporation (Issuer Direct Corporation and its subsidiaries are hereinafter collectively referred to as "Issuer Direct", the "Company", "We" or "Our" unless otherwise noted). We are a Delaware corporation formed in October 1988 under the name Docucon Incorporated. In December 2007, we changed our name to Issuer Direct Corporation. Our corporate offices are located at 500 Perimeter Park Drive, Suite D, Morrisville, North Carolina, 27560.  Issuer Direct is an industry-leading communications and compliance company focusing on the needs of corporate issuers. Issuer Direct's principal platform, Platform id.TM, empowers users by thoughtfully integrating the most relevant tools, technologies and services, thus eliminating the complexity associated with producing and distributing financial and business communications.  We work with a diverse client base in the financial services industry, including brokerage firms, banks and mutual funds. We also sell products and services to corporate issuers, professional firms, such as investor relations and public relations, and the accounting and the legal communities. Corporate issuers and their constituents utilize our cloud-based platforms and related services from document creation all the way to dissemination to regulatory bodies, platforms and shareholders.  In the past, we have reported our revenues in three different streams:  We announce material financial information to our investors using our investor relations website, Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC") filings, investor events, news and earnings releases, public conference calls, webcasts and social media. We use these channels to communicate with our investors and the public about our company, our products and services and other issues. It is possible that information we post on some of these channels could be deemed to be material information. Therefore, we encourage investors, the media, and others interested in our company to review the information we post to all of our channels, including our social media accounts.  Platform and Technology  As the Company continues its transition to a cloud-based subscription business, we expect the Platform and Technology portion of our business to continue to expand over the next several years and become the majority of the company's revenues. Leading this transition are the technology offerings from our ACCESSWIRE news business and our core historical tools for disclosure management and shareholder communications.  Additionally, our product road map includes planned advancements in both our current Platformid. offering as well as additional offerings in which we see long term opportunity. These advancements will leverage our current application technology framework and give us an opportunity to further expand our customer and user base.  Platform id.  Platform id. is a cloud-based subscription platform that efficiently and effectively manages the events of a company that seeks to distribute its messaging to key constituents, investors, markets and regulatory systems around the globe. Currently, platform id. consists of nine related but distinct shareholder communications and disclosure reporting modules. Part of these capabilities were historically part of our disclosure management and shareholder communications offerings, but are now included into our fully integrated platform.  Within most of our target markets, customers require several individual services or software providers to meet their investor relations, communications and compliance needs. We believe platform id. breaks down those barriers and combines all those needs into a single sign-on platform - one that offers a company control, increases efficiencies, demonstrates a clear ROI and, most importantly, delivers consistent and compliant messaging from one centralized platform.  While the complete platform is available for a single subscription fee, companies also have the flexibility to choose one or more of the specific modules that fit their needs based on the stage of the company's development. Set forth below are the nine modules currently included in platform id.:  ACCESSWIRE(TM)  Our press release platform is a cost-effective FD (Fair Disclosure) news dissemination and media outreach service. The ACCESSWIRE business focuses on press release distribution for both private and publicly held companies globally. ACCESSWIRE is fast becoming a competitive alternative to the traditionally major newswires, because we have been able to expand upon our distribution with key partners, increase our analytics reporting and maintain the simple flat rate licensing and per release options. As a result, we anticipate we will continue to add new clients throughout 2017 and beyond. We will continue to brand our press release offerings under the name ACCESSWIRE, which we believe will solidify our market position in the newswire business.  ACCESSWIRE is dependent upon several key partners for news distribution, some of which are also partners that we rely on for other investor outreach offerings. A disruption in any of these partnerships could have a materially adverse impact on our business.  Classify(TM)  Classify is our buy-side, sell-side and media targeting database and intelligence analytics platform that customers can add on to their Platform id. subscription. This subscription-based platform is centered around both our shareholder communications and news distribution offerings. We hope the Classify analytics and peer review application will become the focal point for our Platform id. dashboard, as customers become increasingly interested in peer performance and real-time alerts to vital data points throughout the day. To ensure the adoption of this subscription feature, we have begun providing select clients with this dashboard on a trial basis and intend to broaden this offering to all customers this fiscal year.  We believe our data-set will be an attractive option for both investor relations and public relations firms and for customers looking for an alternative to current products in the market, based on price and flexibility, as well as data quality and quantity. Further to our strategy, the Classify dataset will be fully integrated into our ACCESSWIRE offering this year as a way to expand distribution via highly focused targeted lists of professionals from our dataset. We expect this to further drive revenues per release as well as subscriptions over the year.  Investor Network(TM)  Over the past year, we have been focused on refining the model of digital distribution of our customer's message to the investment community. This has been accomplished by integrating Investor Networks analytics into and with our Classify dashboard. Most of the customers subscribing to this platform today, are historical Precision IR ("PIR") - Annual Report Service ("ARS") users. We have migrated many of those customers from the traditional ARS business into this new digital subscription business. However, there can be no assurances these customers will continue long term using this digital platform if market conditions for shareholder interest is not present.  Earnings Events  There are over 5,000 companies in North America conducting earnings events each quarter that include teleconference, webcast or both as part of their events. Along with webcasting and teleconference, our platform incorporates each element of the earnings event including earnings announcement, earnings press release and SEC Form 8-K filings. There are a handful of our competitors that can offer this today. However, we believe our real-time event setup and integrated approach offers a more effective way to manage the process as well as attract an audience of investors.  In the teleconference and webcasting space, we spent time in the latter part of 2016 developing and integrating systems and processes with our platform and partners. The earnings event business is a highly competitive space with the majority of the business being driven from practitioners in the investor and communications firms. Toward the end of 2016, we created an application protocol interface ("API") for the webcast marketplace, and will begin partnering with publishers and other platforms to license our datasets, which we believe will further increase our brand awareness. This API license will allow publishers to query single or multiple companies' current and past earnings calls and present those webcasts on their platforms. Additionally, as a commitment to broadening the reach of our webcast platform, all events will be broadcast live on our Investor Network platform, which will drive new audiences and give companies the ability to view their analytics and engagement of each event. We believe these competitive advantages will increase the demand for our webcasting platform among the corporate issuer community.  Investor Relations ("IR") Websites & Data Feeds  Inside of Platform id. is our investor relations content network which is used to create the IR tab of a public company's website. This investor relations content network is a robust market data cloud of news, stock, fundamentals, regulatory filings, corporate governance, hotlines and many other components that are aggregated from a majority of the major exchanges and news distribution outlets around the world. These data feeds are licensed individually and as a complete platform to pre-IPO, reporting companies and partners seeking to display our content on their platforms. The clear benefits to our IR platform is its integration into and with the entire cloud-based system, meaning companies can produce content for public distribution and it is automatically linked to their corporate site, distributed to targeted groups and placed into and with our data feed partners.  Whistleblower Hotline  Our whistleblower platform is an add-on product within Platform id. This system delivers secure notifications and basic incident workflow management processes that align with a company's corporate governance whistleblower policy. As a supported and subsidy bundle product of the New York Stock Exchange ("NYSE") offerings, it is our hope we will gain relationship with new IPO clients and other larger cap clients listed on the NYSE.  Blueprint(TM)  Blueprint is our cloud-based document conversion, editing and filing platform, that was designed for reporting companies and professionals seeking to insource the document drafting, editing and filing processes to the SEC and SEDAR (System for Electronic Document Analysis and Retrieval), which is the Canadian equivalent of EDGAR. Blueprint is available in both a secure public cloud with the Company's Platformid. subscription, as well as in a private cloud for corporations, mutual funds and the legal community looking to further enhance their internal document process. Our belief is that once fully developed and marketed, we will see a negative impact on our legacy disclosure conversion services business in the future. However, the margins associated with our subscription business compared to our services business are higher and align with our long-term strategy, and as such we hope Blueprint will have a positive impact on our net income in the future.  Stock Transfer  A valued subscription in our Platformid. ecosystem is the ability for our customers to gain access to real-time information of their shareholders, stock ledgers, reports, and issue new shares from our cloud-based platform. Managing the capitalization table of a public company or pre-IPO company is the cornerstone of corporate governance and transparency, and as such companies, bond offerings, and community banks have chosen our transfer agent subsidiary, Direct Transfer, LLC, to assist with their stock transfer needs. This is an industry which has experienced declining revenues as it was affected by the convergence of paper certificates to digital form. However, we have recently been focused on licensing opportunities of our stock transfer platform, allowing customers to gain access to our cloud-based system in order to move shares or query shareholders, which has significantly changed the long term dynamics for both our customers and us.  During the fourth quarter of 2016, we completed a strategic upgrade to our platform that reaches private companies seeking to raise capital under Regulation A+, and Regulation D. This cloud-based system was released during the first quarter of 2017 under the brand Transferly. Transferly is a subscription platform that gives companies and broker dealers the ability to assist in the process of identifying, managing and completing the investment process of an offering. Once an offering is completed, companies can utilize our stock transfer system to continue the communication and compliance issuance work a company is required to manage.  Proxy - Annual General Meeting (AGM)  Our proxy business is marketed as a fully integrated, real-time voting platform for our customers and their shareholders of record. This platform is utilized for every annual meeting and or special meeting we manage for our client base and offers both full-set mailing and notice of internet availability options.  Services  As the Company focuses on expanding its cloud-based subscription business, we expect to see a decrease in the overall revenues associated with our Services business. Typically, Services revenues relate to where resources are required to perform the work for our clients and or hard goods are utilized as part of the engagement. To date, most of our Services have been related to converting and editing SEC documents and XBRL tagging, which has been our core disclosure business over the last 11 years. Services also include telecommunications services and print, fulfillment and delivery of stock certificates, proxy materials or annual reports depending on each customer's engagement. Services are not required, but are optional for customers that utilize our Platform id.  Our investor outreach and engagement offering, formerly known as the ARS, now known as the Investor Network, was acquired from PIR. The ARS business has existed for over 20 years primarily as a physical hard copy delivery service of annual reports and prospectuses globally for tens of thousands of customers. We continue to operate a portion of this legacy system and continue to migrate the install base over to our subscriptions business of Investor Network, which is our digital platform and outreach engagement dataset. Portions of this legacy system are still operational, specifically for those who opt to take advantage of physical delivery of material. We believe we will continue to see further attrition of both customers and revenues in this category as we focus our efforts on our digital platforms and subscription business.  Results of Operations  Comparison of results of operations for the three months ended March 31, 2017 and 2016:  Three months ended  March 31,  2017 2016 Revenue Streams  Platform and Technology Revenue $1,413,589 $945,219 Gross margin $1,168,293 $775,551 Gross margin % 83% 82% Services Revenue $1,442,542 2,332,120 Gross margin $941,741 1,731,706 Gross margin % 65% 74% Total Revenue $2,856,131 $3,277,339 Gross margin $2,110,034 $2,507,257 Gross margin % 74% 77%  Revenues  Total revenue decreased by $421,208, or 13%, to $2,856,131 during the three-month period ended March 31, 2017, as compared to $3,277,339 during the same period of 2016. Included in revenue for the three-month period ended March 31, 2016, is the benefit of $316,040 related to the reversal of an accrual of unused postage credits related to ARS clients acquired from PIR. Absent the one-time benefit related to the reversal of the postage accrual in the three months ended March 31, 2016, revenues for the three-month period ended March 31, 2017 would have decreased 4% compared to the same period in the prior year.  Platform and Technology revenue increased $468,370, or 50%, to $1,413,589 during the three-month period ended March 31, 2017, as compared to $945,219 during the same period of 2016. A majority of the increase is due to the continued success of our ACCESSWIRE news distribution platform, which increased $417,024 during the three-month period ended March 31, 2017, as compared to the same period of the prior year. The increase is attributable to our investment in increased sales staff and distribution during the latter part of 2016 as the Company was able to continue to penetrate the newswire market. Additionally, we earned increased revenue from the same period of the prior year from other platforms including our Blueprint, whistleblower, webcasting, Classify, stock transfer, IR website and data feeds and proxy platforms. These increases were offset by a decline in revenue from our Investor Network platform.  Services revenue decreased $889,578, or 38%, to $1,442,542 during the three-month period ended March 31, 2017, as compared to $2,332,120 during the same period of 2016. The decrease is primarily associated with a decrease in revenue from our ARS services, due in part to a benefit recorded during the three-month period ended March 31, 2016 related to the reversal of the accrual for unused postage credits noted earlier, as well as continued client attrition as customers elect to leave the service or transition to digital fulfillment. Additionally, we experienced a decline in revenue from our print and proxy distribution services as well as stock transfer services, which are project based services and dependent on the timing of our customers and corporate directives. A portion of the projects performed in the prior year were one-time projects and certain projects that we anticipated performing in the three- month period ended March 31, 2017, were delayed to the second quarter. We also experienced a decline in our traditional Edgar and XBRL services due to continued pricing pressure in those markets.  No customers accounted for more than 10% of the operating revenues during the three-month periods ended March 31, 2017 or 2016.  Revenue Backlog  At March 31, 2017, we have recorded deferred revenue of $859,337 that we expect to recognize over the next twelve months, compared to $842,642 at December 31, 2016. Deferred revenue primarily consists of advance billings for annual contracts for legacy ARS services and licenses of our cloud-based platforms.  Cost of Revenues and Gross Margin  Cost of revenues consists primarily of direct labor costs, third party licensing and amortization of capitalized software costs related to our platforms licensed to customers in our Platform and Technology stream and direct labor costs, warehousing, logistics, print production materials, postage, and outside services directly related to the delivery of services to our customers in our Services stream. Cost of revenues decreased by $23,985, or 3%, during the three-month period ended March 31, 2017, as compared to the same period of 2016. Overall gross margin decreased to 74%, or $2,110,034, in the three-month period ended March 31, 2017, as compared to 77%, or $2,507,257 in the same period of 2016. Excluding the benefit associated with the release of the accrual related to unused postage credits, gross margin for the three-month period ended March 31, 2016, would have been 74%.  Gross margins from Platform and Technology was 83% in the three-month period ended March 31, 2017, as compared to 82% in the same period of 2016. The increase in gross margin percentage is primarily due to increased revenue from our ACCESSWIRE platform partially offset by increased amortization of capitalized software related to our platforms.  Gross margins from our Services revenue decreased to 65% in the three-month period ended March 31, 2017, as compared to 74% in the same period of 2016. Excluding the benefit associated with the release of the unused postage credits, gross margins for the three-month period ended March 31, 2016 would have been 70%. The decrease in gross margin percentage during the first quarter of 2017 compared to the same quarter of 2016 is due to lower revenue associated with fixed costs of delivering ARS, print and proxy and stock transfer services.  Operating Expenses  General and Administrative Expense  General and administrative expenses consist primarily of salaries, stock-based compensation, insurance, fees for professional services, general corporate expenses and facility and equipment expenses. General and administrative expenses increased $68,857, or 8%, during the three-month period ended March 31, 2017 as compared to the same period of 2016. The increase is primarily due to an increase in professional fees for legal, tax and accounting services, partially offset by a decrease in bad debt expense.  As a percentage of revenue, General and Administrative expenses were 32% for the three-month period ended March 31, 2017, up from 26% for the same period of 2016.  Sales and Marketing Expenses  Sales and marketing expenses consist primarily of salaries, stock-based compensation, sales commissions, advertising expenses, and marketing expenses. Sales and marketing expenses for the three-month period ended March 31, 2017, decreased by $30,292, or 5%, as compared to the same period of 2016. This decrease is due to a decrease in sales personnel costs as a result of lower headcount during the quarter.  As a percentage of revenue, sales and marketing expense were 21% during the three-month period ended March 31, 2017, compared to 19% for the same period of 2016.  Product Development  Product Development expenses consist primarily of salaries, stock-based compensation, bonuses and licenses to develop new products and technology to complement and/or enhance platform id. Product development costs increased $55,693, or 81%, during the three-month period ended March 31, 2017, compared to the same period in 2016. The increase is the result of higher salaries and less capitalization of costs as certain projects are completed and pushed into production. During the three-month periods ended March 31, 2017 and 2016, the Company capitalized $365,973 and $526,564, respectively, of software development costs.  Depreciation and Amortization  Depreciation and amortization expenses during the three-month period ended March 31, 2017, decreased by $176,083, or 62%, as compared to the same period of 2016. The decrease is due to lower amortization of certain intangible assets acquired in the PIR acquisition that became fully amortized during the year ended December 31, 2016.  Other income (expense)  Other income (expense) for the three-month period ended March 31, 2017, is primarily the result of the change in fair value of stock received, in lieu of cash, to settle an outstanding receivable.  Income tax expense  We recognized income tax expense of $40,579 and $197,922 for the three-month periods ended March 31, 2017 and 2016, respectively. At the end of each interim period, we estimate the effective tax rate we expect to be applicable for the full fiscal year and this rate is applied to our results for the year-to-date period, and then adjusted for any discrete period items. For the three-month period ended March 31, 2017, the variance between the Company's effective tax rate and the U.S. statutory rate of 34% is primarily attributable to the excess stock-based compensation tax benefit of $77,272 recognized in income tax expense during the period, in connection with the Company's adoption of ASU 2016-09, as well as, foreign statutory tax rate differentials and tax credits.  During the three-month period ended March 31, 2016, the Company released $78,400 of its valuation allowance related to federal and state net operating losses, which resulted in a net benefit of $40,875. This, along with foreign statutory tax rate differentials and tax credits, is the reason for the variance from the U.S. statutory rate for the three-months ended March 31, 2016.  Net Income  Net income for the three-month period ended March 31, 2017, was $324,942 compared to $493,288 for the same period of 2016.  As noted earlier, included in net income for the three-month period ended March 31, 2016 is the benefit of $316,040 before taxes related to the reversal of an accrual related to unused postage credits related to ARS clients acquired from PIR. Notwithstanding, the benefit of this reversal, the Company was able to maintain gross margin percentage on slightly lower revenue.  Liquidity and Capital Resources  As of March 31, 2017, we had $5,589,295 in cash and cash equivalents and $1,315,499 in net accounts receivable. Current liabilities at March 31, 2017, totaled $2,221,042 including our accounts payable, deferred revenue, accrued liabilities, income taxes payable and other accrued expenses. At March 31, 2017, our current assets exceeded our current liabilities by $4,942,835.  Effective September 2, 2016, the Company renewed its Line of Credit, which reduced the interest rate to LIBOR plus 2.50% from LIBOR plus 3.00%. The amount of funds available for future borrowings remained at $2,000,000. As of March 31, 2017, the interest rate was 3.48% and the Company did not owe any amounts on the Line of Credit.  We manage our cash flow carefully with the intent to meet our obligations from cash generated from operations. However, it is possible that we will have to raise additional funds through the issuance of equity in order to meet any future obligations. There can be no assurance that cash generated from operations will be sufficient to fund our operating expenses, to allow us to pay dividends, or meet our other obligations, and there is no assurance that debt or equity financing will be available, or if available, that such financing will be upon terms acceptable to us.  2017 Outlook  . . .  May 04, 2017  (c) 1995-2017 Cybernet Data Systems, Inc. All Rights Reserved 


More from MarketWatch









More Coverage


Dow fights to trade above 22,000 as stocks struggle after lackluster services report


Trump is right about record earnings — and these companies are getting even more profitable


3 reasons a stock-market correction is coming in late summer or early fall















Most Popular





Dow 22,000 means the worst is yet to come





Apple’s stock could double on the ‘mother of all artificial-intelligence projects’





Why Dow 22,000 is not good news for most Americans





3 reasons a stock-market correction is coming in late summer or early fall





What 'Flash Boys' Brad Katsuyama thinks is killing Wall Street trade




MarketWatch Partner Center




















 








            We Want to
            Hear from You


Join the conversation
Comment
















Sponsored Headlines













Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found







































 




















Issuer Direct Corp (ISDR.A)  Company Profile | Reuters.com


























































X



Edition:

United States


















Africa
América Latina


عربي
Argentina


Brasil
Canada


中国
Deutschland


España
France


India
Italia


日本
México


РОССИЯ
United Kingdom

United States
















Profile: Issuer Direct Corp (ISDR.A)





Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerIndustrialsBusiness Support Services












                
                        Overview
                    



                
                        News
                    



                
                        Key Developments
                    



                
                        People
                    



                
                        Charts
                    



                
                        Financials
                    



                
                        Analysts
                    



                    
                            Research
                        



                    
                            Pulse
                        










				ISDR.A on American Stock Exchange


				12.50USD
2 Aug 2017





				    Change	(% chg)


		    
						    $0.00


					            (+0.00%)
					        






Prev Close

$12.50


Open

$12.55




Day's High

$12.55


Day's Low

$12.55




Volume

5


Avg. Vol

2,793




52-wk High

$13.70


52-wk Low

$6.50












					Full Description



Issuer Direct Corporation, incorporated on October 11, 1988, is a provider of disclosure management solutions and cloud-based compliance technologies. The Company reports its products and services revenues in revenue streams, such as disclosure management, shareholder communications, and platforms and technology. The Company works with a client base in the financial services industry, including brokerage firms, banks and mutual funds. It also sells products and services to corporate issuers, professional firms, such as investor relations and public relations, and the accounting and the legal community. The Company's portfolio of brands and products include Issuer Direct, Investor Network, Accesswire, Blueprint, Classify, iProxy Direct, iR Direct, Annual Report Service (ARS) and Company Spotlight.The Company announces material financial information to investors using its investor relations Website, Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) filings, investor events, news and earnings releases, public conference calls and Webcasts. It uses these channels, as well as social media to communicate with investors and the public about Company, products and services, and other issues. The Company's technology platform, the Disclosure Management System (DMS), is a secure cloud based workflow compliance and communications system for corporate issuers, funds and compliance professionals. DMS allows officers, directors, compliance and investor/public relations' professionals the ability to manage the entire back-office functions of their respective companies from its interface. DMS includes applications, such as Regulatory compliance (Edgar and extensible business reporting language (XBRL)); real-time financial reviewers guide; investor relation content management (content management system); Webcasting teleconference; news/earnings distribution; shareholder outreach; investor network; annual meeting planning and real-time proxy voting system; stock issuances, and shareholder reporting; whistleblower compliance, and print on demand and digital document library.Disclosure ManagementThe Company's disclosure business consists of traditional document conversion, typesetting and pre-press design services, XBRL tagging services, and the issuance of securities as it relates to its stock transfer business. These services represent its disclosure offerings that are regulated by the Securities and Exchange Commission.Shareholder CommunicationsThe Company's shareholder communications offerings are centered around annual and quarterly earnings events of a public company, which includes press release distribution, investor outreach and engagement services, Webcast teleconference services, investor hotline, and legacy proxy and printing services. Many of these services are marketed and bundled under annual agreements.The Company's press release platform, Accesswire, is a Fair Disclosure (FD) news dissemination service. The Accesswire business focuses on press release distribution for both private and publicly held companies. Its investor outreach and engagement offering is known as ARS. Its platform incorporates each element of the earnings event, including earnings announcement, earnings press release, and SEC Form 8-K filings. The Company markets and sells its Webcasting platforms and teleconference systems in North America, the United Kingdom, Sweden and Germany, the markets in which it has clients subscribing to its Investor Network platform.The Company's clients license Investor Hotline platform to integrate into their corporate investor relations platform and utilize its call center product by including their toll-free number into their proxy and annual meeting services. Its proxy business is marketed as an integrated, real-time voting platform for corporate issuers and their shareholders of record. This platform is utilized for every annual meeting and or special meeting the Company manages for its client base, and offers both full-set mailing and notice of Internet availability options.Platform & TechnologyThe Company's platform & technology business includes product subscriptions from each of its businesses, disclosure management and shareholder communications. In disclosure management, the Company provides Blueprint, a cloud-based document conversion, editing and filing platform for corporate issuers seeking to insource the document drafting, editing and filings processes. Blueprint is available in both a secure public cloud within the Company's disclosure management system, as well as in a private cloud for corporations and the legal community looking to manage their internal document process. Blueprint includes both the Edgar and XBRL process for corporate issuers. With the shareholder communications business, the Company offers Classify, an initial buy-side, sell-side and media targeting database and intelligence platform. This subscription-based platform is centered around both shareholder communications and news distribution businesses. In addition, the Company's product roadmap includes development of both Investor Network and Classify products.

» Full Overview of ISDR.A







					Company Address



Issuer Direct Corp
500 Perimeter Park Dr Ste DMORRISVILLE   NC   27560-9638
P: +1919.4611600F: +1202.5213505







					Company Web Links



Home Page








					Officers & Directors






Name
Compensation




							 Andre Boisvert

110,400




							 Brian Balbirnie

180,345




							 Steven Knerr

--




							 William Everett

--




							 James Galleher

--




» More Officers & Directors





					Issuer Direct Corp News




BRIEF-Issuer Direct qtrly revenue $2.9 mln

May 04 2017 
BRIEF-Issuer Direct qtrly earnings per share $0.17

Mar 02 2017 

» More ISDR.A  News
















Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerIndustrialsBusiness Support Services























MarketWatch.com Topics

























Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets Close in:



Market Snapshot
Winners and Losers


















Topics







		Istanbul



			Brexit




		Guns







		Millennials




		Immigration



			Apple

/conga/topics/main.html
369880



Subjects in the news



Sales


Steel and Iron


Taxes


Earnings


Health Care


Banks and Banking




Credit


Ice


Markets


Politics and Government


Production


Gas Prices




Russia


Oil


U.S. Politics


Europe


London Markets


Architecture






People in the news



Li Ka-Shing


Musk, Elon


Trump, Donald


Buffett, Warren


David, George


George, David




Greenspan, Alan


Wilson, Michael


Gold, Howard


Hussein


Cook, Tim


Dauman, Philippe




Clarke, Andrew


Gates, Bill


Miles, David


Rodriguez, Alex


Disney, Walt


Martin, John






Companies in the news



Clorox Co.


Aetna Inc.


Performance


New York Mercantile Exchange


United Health Services


University Health Services




The Irvine


Capital One Financial


Communications Workers of America


Best Buy Co. Inc.


Kraft Foods Inc


Staples Inc.




Wal-Mart Stores


Whole Foods Market


Travel


Morgan Stanley


Facebook


International Data Group






Organizations in the news



American Petroleum Institute


OPEC


Securities and Exchange Commission


University of California


University of Pennsylvania


University of Southern California




University of Washington


Washington University


Bank of England


European Union


Nasdaq Stock Market


World Bank




Congress


University of Michigan


World Health Organization


Federal Reserve Bank of New York


Federal Reserve Board


European Central Bank












Browse topics:


A


B


C


D


E


F


G


H


I


J


K


L


M


N


O


P


Q


R


S


T


U


V


W


X


Y


Z


0-9





















Log In




11:55 AM EDT
August 3, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Open


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
11:55aClothes, meat, champagne and electronics — coming to a vending machine near you
11:47aCongress wouldn’t do it, so Fannie and Freddie reformed themselves
11:41aDow tags the 22,000 mark, also quietly clears the 20-day volatility bands
11:33aTreasury yields dip as traders look ahead to payrolls
11:29aSquare stock price target raised to $26 from $18 at Canaccord Genuity
11:29aGood news: Employees are starting to get serious about saving for retirement 
11:29aOil prices rise as investors focus on U.S. data
11:27aTrump’s long vacation is needed to stop leaks to the White House press
11:17aGM's Chevy Bolt beats Tesla's Model S in Consumer Reports' range test
11:12aTeva shares plummet 18% on cheaper generic drug prices, pulling rivals lower
11:11aDovish or hawkish? Bank of England leaves traders confused after ‘Super Thursday’
11:11aHere’s proof the average U.S. household isn’t the ‘dumb money’
11:10aDoes your kid really want a $200 stuffed giraffe?
11:08aTesla is a large public company, and Elon Musk must start acting like it
11:07aVoters golfing with President Trump? That was one Scaramucci idea before his exit
11:05aSnap's stock plunges further as rival Instagram Stories celebrates one-year anniversay
11:05aCheesecake Factory price target cut to $44 from $50 at Instinet
11:04aCheesecake Factory shares down 3.6% in Thursday trading
11:03aDocumentary Clip: 'Icarus'
11:03aCheesecake Factory price target cut to $50 from $60 at Canaccord Genuity
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
22,020.09

+3.85
+0.02%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,345.95

-16.70
-0.26%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.47

-5.10
-0.21%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15






















































Issuer Direct Corp. | Company Spotlight Profile











Warning! This site has features that require JavaScript.












watch









        Issuer Direct Corp.
        


Sector: 


            Commercial Printing
          
Region: 

NC, United States


 
  : 

|
NYSE MKT: ISDR


  





          Issuer Direct Corp. is a regulatory compliance specialist and innovator of corporate issuer services. The company enables its corporate issuers to produce, distribute and communicate their financial and business communications online and in print. It operates under several brands in the market, including Issuer Direct, iProxy Direct, Issuer Services, Direct Transfer, iR Direct, XBRL Check and QX Interactive. Issuer Direct works with a diverse client base in the financial services industry, including brokerage firms, banks, mutual funds, corporate issuers, shareholders and specialty firms such as accountants and the legal community. The company was founded in October 1988 and is headquartered in Morrisville, NC.
        


♣ Request Investor Kit

 View Contact Details







 Investor Calendar


Asia/Taipei

More options...



        time zone
        



watch






 Aug  4, 2017
            4:30 am
        
        |
        Second Quarter 2017 Earnings Call


Reminder







 May  5, 2017
            4:30 am
        
        |
        First Quarter 2017 Earnings Call






 Executives




          Brian R. Balbirnie,
          Chief Executive Officer
Brian Balbirnie serves as our Chief Executive Officer and strategist. Brian established Issuer Direct in 2006 with a vision of creating a technology driven back-office compliance platform that would reduce costs as well as increase the efficiencies of the most complex tasks. Today the company calls it the Disclosure Management System (DMS). Brian is responsible for the strategic leadership of the company and oversees day-to-day operations. Under Brian’s direction, the Company has grown to serve over 1,000 public companies since 2006.     Brian is an entrepreneur with more than 20 years of experience in emerging industries. Prior to Issuer Direct, Brian was the founder and managing partner of Catapult Company, a compliance and consulting practice focused on the Sarbanes Oxley Act. Brian also has served in ‘C’ level capacities for various companies both public and private. Prior to and with Catapult, Brian also advised several companies on their public market strategies, Merger & Acquisitions as well as their financial reporting requirements.
        

          Steve Knerr,
          Chief Financial Officer
Steve joined PrecisionIR in August 2010 and has held various accounting positions from Assistant Controller to Global Controller. Steve assumed the interim-Chief Financial Officer post in May 2015.

Prior to joining PrecisionIR, Steve was Vice-President and Assistant Controller for RHI Entertainment, Inc. (now known as Sonar Entertainment) from April 2006 to August 2010. At RHI, Steve was responsible for preparation of SEC filings. Prior to RHI, Steve served as Accounting Manager for Chesapeake Corporation and spent six years with KPMG as an audit professional. Steve is a Certified Public Accountant and received a Bachelor of Science in Business Administration from the University of Richmond.
        

          Michael “Miguel” Colón,
          Vice President, Global Sales
Prior to joining Issuer Direct Mr. Colón was the founder and CEO of SEC Compliance Services a full service XBRL and EDGAR provider.  SEC Compliance Services captured significant market share in less than a year, which led to the purchase of its assets by Issuer Direct Corporation.  Prior to founding SECCS, Michael served as the managing partner of a boutique venture development firm where he oversaw the firm’s investment and acquisition strategy.  He has served in various executive positions in the technology industry for both public and private companies.  Mr. Colón formed a merger and acquisition groups for two publicly traded companies, and has managed several mergers, acquisitions, and public and private capital formations.      Mr. Colón is an Adjunct Faculty member at Chabot College where he helped design the College’s Entrepreneurship Program, where he teaches Entrepreneurship.  Michael is President of the San Francisco board for the National Society of Hispanic MBA’s (NSHMBA), an organization focused on furthering Latino professionals through graduate education. Mr. Colón received his Masters of Business Administration (MBA) and Bachelors of Arts in Management from St. Mary’s College of California.
        

          James G. Michael,
          Vice President, Global Corporate Solutions
Since joining Issuer Direct in 2006, James Michael has helped grow the company from an idea into a highly profitable products and services company leading the industry in innovation and execution.  James is responsible for strategic product and service development, bringing those ideas to market and driving profitability.  James has direct responsibility for the iProxy and iFundDirect brands along with being a driving force in making Issuer Direct the leader in Disclosure Management.       Prior to joining Issuer Direct James was instrumental in proving then developing Canada as a viable market for Sageworks Inc, and previously served with Intercall focusing on shareholder meeting execution and earning calls.  He holds a bachelor’s degree in Marketing from the University of North Carolina Greensboro.
        

          M. Eddie Tobler,
          Vice President, Stock Transfer
Mr. Tobler joined Issuer Direct in 2009 from First Citizens Bank, where he worked in the Corporate Trust and Institutional Services Group. For the past eight years Mr. Tobler has been involved in the various capital transactions, IPO’s, divestures, spin-offs, go-private transactions, tender offers, dividend and reinvestment plans, with both with corporate issuers and community Banks. Mr. Tobler also has served as inspector of elections in several annual meetings and has a vast understanding of corporate compliance and regulatory matters.       Mr. Tobler holds his Bachelor’s degree from North Carolina State University and both his Master of Business Administration (MBA) and Master of Accounting from Gardner Webb University.
        





 News & Analysis
















 Related Links


Issuer Direct Stock Information
Investor Fact Sheet 
Company News
Earnings Calls and Transcripts 
Investor Targeting Services
Stock Transfer Agent Services 
Financial Printing Services
Proxy Solicitation Services
XBRL Conversion Services 
Press Release Distribution
Investor Relations Websites
Corporate Social Media Services 










×
Contact Investor Relations



Issuer Direct Corp.
Investor Relations
         500 Perimeter Park DriveSuite D
         Morrisville , NC 27560
         United States
Phone:1.919.481.4000

SIC Code:
2750



Close




×
Request Investor Kit









Delivery Method:



            Hard Copy
          


            Electronic
          


            Both
          



Select your country:


Afghanistan
Aland Islands
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bonaire, St. Eust., Saba
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Bouvet Island
Brazil
Brit. Indian Ocean Terr.
British Virgin Islands
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo (Dem. Rep. of the)
Congo (Rep. of)
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Croatia
Cuba
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Terr.
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guernsey
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Heard & McDonald Islands
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Ivory Coast
Jamaica
Japan
Jersey
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
La Reunion
Laos
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marianas
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Micronesia
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
North Korea
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Palestine
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Romania
Russian Federation
Rwanda
Saint Barthelemy
Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Martin
Saint Pierre & Miquelon
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Sint Marten
Slovakia
Slovenia
So Georgia & So Sand Isl
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
St Vincent & Grenadines
St. Lucia
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syria
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Timor-Leste
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
U.S. Minor Outlying Isl.
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands
Wallis & Futuna
Western Sahara
Yemen
Zambia
Zimbabwe





E-mail:


required field!



First Name:


required field!



Last Name:


required field!




Street 1:


required field!



Street 2:





City:


required field!



State/Province:


-
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming


required field!



Postal Code:


required field!






 I consent to receiving periodic email communications from Issuer Direct Corp.. 
            

 I'd like to receive more information from PrecisionIR.
            









Watch

Watch this company to be notified of upcoming earnings calls and new content with a weekly digest sent to your email.
            
 Watch content
            




Go!
Cancel






Company Spotlight is available free to investors through the financial support of participating companies. In return for receiving this free information, your contact data are made available to the companies whose reports you have ordered, and to other parties as described in our privacy policy, which you can read in its entirety here. In addition, you agree to be contacted by these companies from time to time. You may select at any time to opt out of these communications by using the unsubscribe link in your email(s) or by sending an email to nacustomerservice@precisionir.com.



×
 Enter your email address to watch this company.




E-mail (required):


required field!



First Name:





Last Name:












    Signup 




×
  Enter your email address and notification preferences.




A reminder has been added for this event.



    Add to Calendar
  


Add to Google Calendar


Add to Live Calendar


Add to Yahoo! Calendar


Add to iCalender


Add to Outlook Calendar







Or





Send me a reminder




Weeks

0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
46
47
48
49
50
51
52



Days

0
1
2
3
4
5
6



Hours

0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23



Minutes

0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
46
47
48
49
50
51
52
53
54
55
56
57
58
59





before the event.

Please enter a valid email to watch!

First Name

Last Name








    Signup 











Issuer Direct

































platform id.






Partnering with thousands of companies, assisting tens of thousands of professionals, and delivering information to millions of shareholders.


This is Issuer Direct - We've got you covered!

How it works
REQUEST DEMO




















Blueprint
Create, edit, collaborate and file any SEC document from our Cloud-based EDGAR Filing Platform.
Read more










ACCESSWIRE
From regional to global distribution, our news network has you covered in real-time, 24/7.
Read more










Classify
Need to know who your shareholders are? Find out how to drive shareholder engagement with the click of a button.
Read more










Annual Meeting / Proxy
Explore our innovative platform that allows you to identify, target and engage your audience in a few easy steps.
Read more









Earnings Events
Obtain real-time access to vital information and engagement analytics. Whether you’re a large cap or micro-cap, our innovative platform is customizable for all your needs.
Read more










Stock Transfer
Engage with our cloud-based shareholder management platform, where you can manage the cap chart, dividends and shareholder data
Read more










IR Websites / Feeds
20+ years of news, stock and financials data, aggregated and delivered to your website and shareholders in real-time.
Read more










Hotline Reporting
Harness the power of both the NYSE approved regulatory whistleblower platform and our investor hotline module for IR professionals
Read more















Blueprint
Disclosure Reporting Platform
Create, review, validate & file in real time with the real deal.
Request a Demo






How We Work.




1. Plan
Together with the client we estimate and clearly define top priorities.




2. Execute
Our work is organized in sprints, and progress is monitored daily.




3. Deliver
A product, ready to be handed to a client or stakeholder is presented.







Issuer Direct® is an industry-leading communications and compliance company focusing on the needs of corporate issuers. Issuer Direct’s principal platform, Platform id., empowers users by thoughtfully integrating the most relevant tools, technologies and services, thus eliminating the complexity associated with producing and distributing financial and business communications. Headquartered in RTP N.C., Issuer Direct serves more than 2,000 public and private companies in more than 18 countries.









US Global HQ
500 Perimeter Park DriveSuite DMorrisville NC 27560
Tel: +1.919.481.4000Fax: +1.919.481.6222
info@issuerdirect.com







Europe
The Lansdowne Building2 Lansdowne RoadCroydon, CR9 2ER, UK
Tel: +44 (0)207.192.0893Fax: +44 (0)207.904.3783
Reg. in England No. 2394368












Platforms

Platform id.
ACCESSWIRE
Investor Network
Transfer.ly





Services

Communications
Compliance
Annual Meeting / Proxy
Transfer Agency





Company

Our Story
Brands
Investor Relations
Management
Careers





Resources

Blog
Events
Library
The Buzz (News)
Webinars
Webinars










© Copyright 2016. All rights reserved.Terms & Conditions - Privacy Policy




















Issuer Direct Corporation Employee Reviews | ComparablyComparablySee how Issuer Direct Corporation employees rate their workplace, and add your review anonymously. Comparably makes work better by making culture and compensation transparent.Company Owner, Exec or HR Leader? Claim This Page Issuer Direct Corporation1Employee  Participants30Total  RatingsCEO CultureLeadershipReviewsJobsBenchmarksAboutQ&ANEWCultureLeadershipReviewsJobsBenchmarksAboutQ&A (NEW)Rate your company10out of 100NO RESULTS stay tuned for more dataExecutive rating?NO RESULTS stay tuned for more dataPaid fairly?60out of 100NO RESULTS stay tuned for more dataQuality of coworkers? 7 or less 0% 8 100% 10 0% 12 0% More than 12 0%NO RESULTS stay tuned for more dataWork hours per day?10out of 100NO RESULTS stay tuned for more dataFuture outlook?DepartmentAll DepartmentsEngineeringProductDesignMarketingExecutiveOperationsAdminBusiness DevelopmentFinanceCommunicationsCustomer SupportHRITLegalSalesEngineeringProductDesignMarketingExecutiveOperationsAdminBusiness DevelopmentFinanceCommunicationsCustomer SupportHRITLegalSalesAll DepartmentsEngineeringProductDesignMarketingExecutiveOperationsAdminBusiness DevelopmentFinanceCommunicationsCustomer SupportHRITLegalSalesEngineeringProductDesignMarketingExecutiveOperationsAdminBusiness DevelopmentFinanceCommunicationsCustomer SupportHRITLegalSalesYears at Current CompanyAll Years at CompanyLess Than 1 Year1 to 2 Years2 to 5 Years5 to 10 YearsOver 10 YearsEthnicityAll EthnicitiesCaucasianHispanic or LatinoAfrican AmericanAsian or Pacific IslanderNative AmericanOtherGenderAll GendersMaleFemaleOKFewer Options More Options Do you work at this company?Rate Your CompanyORKnow someone that works at Issuer Direct Corporation?Send InviteLeadershipScore: 17/100 Bottom 5%Compared to other companies of similar size in the US10out of 100NO RESULTS stay tuned for more dataExecutive rating?QuestionHow would you rate your executive team?Share this page or Click here to add your rating30out of 100NO RESULTS stay tuned for more dataCEO rating?QuestionHow would you rate your CEO?Share this page or Click here to add your rating10out of 100NO RESULTS stay tuned for more dataManager rating?QuestionHow would you rate your manager?Share this page or Click here to add your ratingQ. What do you like best about the leadership team?They are adamant about business as usual even when their tactics don't work. VP of Sales uses shady used car salesman tactics to get deals.Aug 01, 2016  •  Leadership review from an employee at Issuer Direct CorporationCompensationScore: 10/100 Bottom 5%Compared to other companies of similar size in the USNO RESULTS stay tuned for more dataPaid fairly?QuestionDo you believe you're paid fairly?Share this page or Click here to add your ratingNO RESULTS stay tuned for more dataAnnual Bonuses?QuestionDoes your company give annual bonuses?Share this page or Click here to add your rating Every 6 months or less 0% Every year 0% Every 2 years 0% Every 3 years or more 0% Never 100%NO RESULTS stay tuned for more dataRaises Often?QuestionHow often do you get a raise?Share this page or Click here to add your ratingQ. What is the best part about your compensation package?5 days of PTO, the workers who do the least get raises/promotions while the work horses stay at the bottom. Completely mismanaged.Aug 01, 2016  •  Compensation review from an employee at Issuer Direct CorporationTeamScore: 27/100 Bottom 5%Compared to other companies of similar size in the USNO RESULTS stay tuned for more dataMeeting effective?QuestionAre your company's meetings effective?Share this page or Click here to add your ratingNO RESULTS stay tuned for more dataCoworker interaction?QuestionDo you look forward to interacting with your coworkers?Share this page or Click here to add your rating60out of 100NO RESULTS stay tuned for more dataQuality of coworkers?QuestionHow would you rate the quality of your coworkers?Share this page or Click here to add your ratingQ. What are some of the best things about your team?Better management and direction.Aug 01, 2016  •  Team review from an employee at Issuer Direct CorporationEnvironmentScore: 33/100 Bottom 5%Compared to other companies of similar size in the US 7 or less 0% 8 100% 10 0% 12 0% More than 12 0%NO RESULTS stay tuned for more dataWork hours per day?QuestionOn average, how many hours do you work a day?Share this page or Click here to add your rating Extremely fast 0% Comfortably fast 0% Moderate 0% A bit slow 0% Bureaucratic 100%NO RESULTS stay tuned for more dataPace at work?QuestionWhat's the work pace at your company?Share this page or Click here to add your rating Positive 0% Negative 100%NO RESULTS stay tuned for more dataPositive work environment?QuestionIs your work environment positive or negative?Share this page or Click here to add your ratingQ. What is most positive about the culture and environment at your company?Reward the people who work hard and not the people who just coast through their work.Aug 01, 2016  •  Environment review from an employee at Issuer Direct CorporationSentimentScore: 23/100 Bottom 5%Compared to other companies of similar size in the US10out of 100NO RESULTS stay tuned for more dataFuture outlook?QuestionHow confident are you about the future success of your company?Share this page or Click here to add your rating Fantastic 0% Good 0% Neutral 100% Bad 0% Terrible 0%NO RESULTS stay tuned for more dataCustomer perception?QuestionHow do your customers perceive your company?Share this page or Click here to add your ratingNO RESULTS stay tuned for more dataExcited going to work?QuestionAre you typically excited about going to work each day?Share this page or Click here to add your ratingQ. What makes you most happy at work?Management won't take advice on how to make things better using feedback from potential customers. They think they know everything!Aug 01, 2016  •  Sentiment review from an employee at Issuer Direct CorporationWorking at Issuer Direct CorporationBenchmarks1 employees at Issuer Direct Corporation have reviewed Issuer Direct Corporation across various culture dimensions, providing their opinions on items ranging from executive ratings to the pace at work. The latest review was 507 days ago.Overall, the 1 Issuer Direct Corporation employees give their leadership a grade of D, or 17 out of 100. This includes specific ratings of their executive team, CEO, and manager.Overall, employees at Issuer Direct Corporation are mostly dissatisfied with their team.  Participants grade the quality of their coworkers a D. Less than half believe the meetings at Issuer Direct Corporation are effective, and less than half look forward to interacting with their coworkers.The majority of employees at Issuer Direct Corporation believe the environment at Issuer Direct Corporation is negative. Most Participants believe the pace of work at Issuer Direct Corporation is bureaucratic. Overall, the employees at Issuer Direct Corporation are dissatisfied, based on their aggregated ratings of future outlook, customer perception, and their excitement going to work. The 1 employees who participated believe the future outlook of Issuer Direct Corporation is something that can improve.


Issuer Direct History































People who just happen to becommunication and compliance specialists





Our Story

Issuer Direct® is an industry-leading communications and compliance company focusing on the needs of corporate issuers. Issuer Direct’s principal platform, Platform id., empowers users by thoughtfully integrating the most relevant tools, technologies and services, thus eliminating the complexity associated with producing and distributing financial and business communications. Headquartered in RTP, NC, Issuer Direct serves more than 2,000 public and private companies in more than 18 countries.QUESTIONS ABOUT US→



How We Work.




1. Plan
Together with the client we estimate and clearly define top priorities.




2. Execute
Our work is organized in sprints, and progress is monitored daily.




3. Deliver
A product, ready to be handed to a client or stakeholder is presented.







Trophy Case



The Technology Fast 500 is the leading technology awards program. For more than 20 years, Deloitte has recognized the fastest growing public and private technology companies in North America.These companies are on the cutting edge, combining technological innovation, entrepreneurship, and rapid growth. Representing industries from software to biotech, Fast 500 companies play in the SaaS, cloud computing, data analytics, and mobile sectors.






Say Hello
Sign up below to join our monthly email listing











Thank you! Your submission has been received!


Oops! Something went wrong while submitting the form








Keep up with / get your alerts now
Receive earnings, corporate & product announcements at the speed of sound.Register

Have a question?
Brett and James from our IR team, or our CEO Brian welcome your questions.Ask away

View NYSE MKT listed ISDR
Investor Network maintains a public profile on us, check it out today, don't forget to create your free account.Visit Investor Network

Presentation / Fact sheet
Get the summary on ISDR today, including a copy of our recent investor presentationView now










US Global HQ
500 Perimeter Park Drive, Suite DMorrisville NC 27560
Tel: 919.481.4000Fax: 919.481.6222
info@accesswire.com







Europe
The Lansdowne Building2 Lansdowne RoadCroydon, CR9 2ER, UK
Tel: +44 (0)207.192.0893Fax: +44 (0)207.904.3783
Reg. in England No. 2394368












Platforms

Platform id.
ACCESSWIRE
Investor Network
Transfer.ly





Services

Communications
Compliance
Annual Meeting / Proxy
Transfer Agency





Company

Our Story
Brands
Investor Relations
Management
Careers





Resources

Blog
Events
Library
The Buzz (News)
Webinars
Webinars










© Copyright 2016. All rights reserved.Terms & Conditions - Privacy Policy


























BBB Search Database of Businesses, Charities, & News Items

















 For full functionality of this site it is necessary to enable JavaScript.
 Here are the 
 instructions how to enable JavaScript in your web browser.
     











No results found.   Ask BBB to develop a report on this business by clicking here.


BBB Search Tips
Use BBB's search bar above to check out businesses and charities from our comprehensive database of BBB Business Profiles. Enter any of the following into the search box:

Business or Charity Name
Website URL
Phone Number
Email Address

Or, select from the categories in the drop-list to search by Type of Business or Type of Charity.
Want to know more about our rating system? Find out more here. 
Need more info?  Try the search FAQs.




















































Issuer Direct Corp Advertising (ISDR)  

























Home




 Homepage


 Membership Levels


 Membership Data Coverage


 Complete Stock List


 Founder's Message


 The Book


 FREE Trial






Screeners


Value Screens 


 All-In-One Screener


 Industry Overview


 Ben Graham Net-Net


 Undervalued Predictable


 Buffett-Munger Screener


 Magic Formula (Greenblatt)


 Historical Low P/S List


 Historical Low P/B List


 Peter Lynch Screen


 High Short Interest


 52-Week/3Y/5Y Lows


 52-Week/3Y/5Y Highs


 Predictable Companies


 S&P 500 Grid


 Dividend Stocks


 Spin Off List




Downloads | Tools


  Excel Add-In GURUF


 Manual of Stocks™


 Download Financial Data


 Download Guru Portfolios


 Download Stock PDFs


 Download Insider Data


  API


 Mobile App




Strategies


 Performances


 Buffett-Munger


 Undervalued Predictable


 Low P/S


 Low P/B


 Broadest Owned


 Most Weighted






Gurus




 Latest Guru Picks


 Real Time Picks


 List of Gurus (Personalize)


 Gurus Portfolios


 Scoreboard


 Top 10 Holdings View


 Sector Picks


 International Picks


 Aggregated Portfolio


 Consensus Picks


 Guru Bargains


 Hot Picks


 Industry Trends


 Geographic Trend


 ETFs


 Options


 European Shorting






Insiders




 All Insiders


 CEO Buys/Sales


 CFO Buys/Sales


 Insider Cluster


 Guru+Insider Double Buys


 Triple Buys/Sales


 Insider Trends


 Canadian Insider


 Dutch Insider






Market


Market Valuation


 Economic Data


 Industry Overview


 Market-Cap/GDP Valuation


 Global Market Valuation


 Shiller P/E


 Shiller P/E By Sectors


 Buffett Assets Allocation




By Country


 USA


 Australia


 Canada


 China


 Germany


 India


 Japan


 UK


 More...






Articles


Articles


 Editor's Picks


 GuruFocus Research


 Value Ideas


 Interviews with Gurus


 Top Ranked


 Value Idea Contest


 Videos


 Following Authors




Submit Articles


 Writers Wanted


 Value Contest Winners


 Submit Articles Online


 My Articles






Conference




 Value Conference


 Speakers


 Location/Venue


 Register


 After Conference Gathering (Free Drinks)






Tutorials




 Tutorials & Webinars


 FAQ


 Contact Us






Log In




 Free Sign-up


 Log In


 7-Day Free Trial 






Subscribe




 Free Trial ($399/Year)


 Refer a Friend & Earn $50














Search
Compare

Search ▾










Get 7-Day Free Trial



My Portfolios▾

Portfolios Overview
Create New Portfolio
Portfolio Contest


My Gurus▾

Quick Browse
Personalize

My Gurus

Premium Gurus 
Premium Plus Investors 



















 ISDR- AMEX (USA)Issuer Direct Corp




Currently 1/5



Business Predictability Rank: 1-Star Back Testing Results:Average gain of all 1-Star stocks: 1.1% per year.% of Stocks that are in still loss if held for 10yrs: 45%.Read more: What is Predictability Rank?Performances of real portfolio
Top Ranked Predictable Companies
 
$12.55     0.05(0.4%) Volume: 1,202  11:20AM EDTAvg Vol (1m): 8,126
Warning! GuruFocus has detected 2 Severe Warning Signs with AMEX:ISDR. Click here to check it out.  







Market Cap :
36.77 M
Enterprise Value :
31.18 M
P/E(TTM) :
26.14
P/B :
3.29

















$12.55 (1y: +78%)



+ Add to Portfolio
Email Alerts
Stock PDFRSSWebsite FilingsDownloadBatch DownloadManual of Stocks™ Web APPManual of Stocks™Sorry. Only PremiumPlus Member can access this feature.Free Trial





This feature is only available for Premium Members, please sign up for
GuruFocus Premium Membership

7-Day Free Trial Now





AMEX:ISDR has been successfully added to your Stock Email Alerts list.
You can manage your stock email alerts here.




AMEX:ISDR has been removed from your Stock Email Alerts list.



Please enter Portfolio Name for new portfolio.


SummaryGuru Trades30-Y FinancialsAnalysisDCFInteractive ChartDividendInsiderOwnershipHeadlinesCompareChecklistDefinitions


	Switch to:
	






















Fundamental

Altman Z-Score


Beneish M-Score


Book Value per Share


Dividends per Share


E10


Earnings per Share (Diluted)


EBITDA per Share


Enterprise Value


EPS without NRI


FFO per Share


Financial Strength


Float Percentage Of Total Shares Outstanding


Free Cash Flow per Share


Insider Ownership


Institutional Ownership


Market Cap (M)


Net Cash per Share


Net Current Asset Value


Net-Net Working Capital


Operating Cash Flow per Share


Owner Earnings per Share (TTM)


Piotroski F-Score


Predictability Rank


Profitability


Revenue per Share


Scaled Net Operating Assets


Short Interest


Short Percentage of Float


Tangible Book per Share


Total Debt per Share




Valuation Ratio

3-Year Average Share Buyback Ratio


Asset Turnover


Cash Conversion Cycle


Cash-to-Debt


COGS-to-Revenue


Current Ratio


Days Inventory


Days Payable


Days Sales Outstanding


Debt-to-Asset


Debt-to-Equity


Earnings Yield %


Earnings Yield (Joel Greenblatt) %


Effective Interest Rate on Debt %


Equity-to-Asset


EV-to-EBIT


EV-to-EBITDA


EV-to-Revenue


Forward PE Ratio


Forward Rate of Return (Yacktman) %


Goodwill-to-Asset


Gross-Profit-to-Asset %


Interest Coverage


Inventory Turnover


Inventory-to-Revenue


LT-Debt-to-Total-Asset


PB Ratio


PE Ratio


PE Ratio


PE Ratio without NRI


PEG Ratio


Price-to-Free-Cash-Flow


Price-to-Operating-Cash-Flow


Price-to-Owner-Earnings


Price-to-Tangible-Book


PS Ratio


Quick Ratio


Return-on-Tangible-Asset


Return-on-Tangible-Equity


ROA %


ROC %


ROC (Joel Greenblatt) %


ROE %


ROIC %


Shiller PE Ratio


Short Ratio


Sloan Ratio %


WACC %




Profitability

FCF Margin %


Gross Margin %


Net Interest Margin (Bank Only) %


Net Margin %


Operating Margin %




Price

Earnings Power Value (EPV)


Graham Number


Intrinsic Value: DCF (Earnings Based)


Intrinsic Value: DCF (FCF Based)


Intrinsic Value: Projected FCF


Margin of Safety % (DCF Earnings Based)


Median PS Value


Net Cash per Share


Peter Lynch Fair Value




Dividends

3-Year Dividend Growth Rate


5-Year Dividend Growth Rate


5-Year Yield-on-Cost %


Dividend Payout Ratio


Dividend Yield %


Dividend-Payout-to-FFO


Forward Dividend Yield %




Income Statement

Advertising


Cost of Goods Sold


Credit Losses Provision


Depreciation, Depletion and Amortization


EBIT


EBITDA


EPS (Basic)


EPS (Diluted)


Fees and Other Income


Gross Profit


Interest Expense


Interest Income


Net Income


Net Income (Continuing Operations)


Net Income (Discontinued Operations)


Net Interest Income


Net Investment Income


Net Policyholder Benefits/Claims


Non Interest Income


Non-Recurring Items


Operating Income


Other Income (Expense)


Other Noninterest Expense


Other Operating Expense


Policy Acquisition Expense


Pre-Tax Income


Preferred Dividends


Research & Development


Revenue


Selling, General, & Admin. Expense


Shares Outstanding (Diluted Average)


SpecialCharges


Tax Expense


Tax Provision


Total Premiums Earned




Balance Sheet

Accounts Payable & Accrued Expense


Accounts Receivable


Accumulated Depreciation


Additional Paid-In Capital


Buildings And Improvements


Capital Lease Obligation


Capital Surplus


Cash And Cash Equivalents


Cash and cash equivalents


Cash, Cash Equivalents, Marketable Securities


Common Stock


Construction In Progress


Current Portion of Long-Term Debt


Deferred Policy Acquisition Costs


Equity Investments


Fixed Maturity Investment


Future Policy Benefits


Goodwill


Gross Property, Plant and Equipment


Intangible Assets


Inventories, Finished Goods


Inventories, Other


Inventories, Raw Materials & Components


Inventories, Work In Process


Land And Improvements


Long-Term Debt & Capital Lease Obligation


Marketable Securities


Money Market Investments


Net Loan


Other Assets for Banks


Other Current Assets


Other Current Liabilities


Other Liabilities for Banks


Other Long Term Assets


Other Long-Term Liabilities


Paid-In Capital


Policyholder Funds


Preferred Stock


Property, Plant and Equipment


Retained Earnings


Securities & Investments


Shares Outstanding (EOP)


Short-term investments


Total Assets


Total Current Assets


Total Current Liabilities


Total Deposits


Total Equity


Total Inventories


Total Liabilities


Treasury Stock


Unearned Premiums


Unpaid Loss & Loss Reserve




Cashflow statement

Capital Expenditure


Cash Flow for Dividends


Cash Flow from Discontinued Operations


Cash Flow from Financing


Cash Flow from Investing


Cash Flow from Operations


Cash Flow from Others


Cash From Discontinued Investing Activities


Cash From Other Investing Activities


Change In Inventory


Change In Receivables


Change In Working Capital


Cumulative Effect Of Accounting Change


Depreciation, Depletion and Amortization


FFO


Free Cash Flow


Net Change in Cash


Net Foreign Currency Exchange Gain


Net Income From Continuing Operations


Net Intangibles Purchase And Sale


Net Issuance of Debt


Net Issuance of Preferred Stock


Net Issuance of Stock


Purchase Of Business


Purchase Of Investment


Purchase Of Property, Plant, Equipment


Sale Of Business


Sale Of Investment


Sale Of Property, Plant, Equipment


Stock Based Compensation








 



		Issuer Direct Corp  (AMEX:ISDR)   Advertising: $0.00 Mil  (As of Mar. 2017)




=GURUF("AMEX:ISDR","Advertising")





Issuer Direct Corp's promotion and advertising for the quarter that ended in Mar. 2017 was $0.00 Mil.






Historical Data
* All numbers are in millions except for per share data and ratio. All numbers are in their local exchange's currency.




Download



						* Premium members only.
						





Issuer Direct Corp Annual Data




Dec07
Dec08
Dec09
Dec10
Dec11
Dec12
Dec13
Dec14
Dec15
Dec16


Advertising















0.00
0.00
0.00
0.00
0.00





Issuer Direct Corp Quarterly Data




Jun12
Sep12
Dec12
Mar13
Jun13
Sep13
Dec13
Mar14
Jun14
Sep14
Dec14
Mar15
Jun15
Sep15
Dec15
Mar16
Jun16
Sep16
Dec16
Mar17


Advertising













































0.00
0.00
0.00
0.00
0.00







Calculation
This is the expense the company spent on promoting an industry, entity, brand, product name, or specific products or services in order to stimulate a desire to buy the entity's products or services.





Headlines

No Headline
















Home  About   Jobs    Advertise    Site Map    Term of Use    Privacy Policy     RSS    Mobile App     Email Alerts    Referral Program    Affiliate Program    FAQ    Contact Us
                               

                © 2004-2017                GuruFocus.com, LLC. All Rights Reserved.
            


                    Disclaimers: GuruFocus.com is not operated by a broker, a dealer, or a registered investment adviser. Under no circumstances does any information posted on GuruFocus.com represent a recommendation to buy or sell a security. The information on this site, and in its related newsletters, is not intended to be, nor does it constitute, investment advice or recommendations. The gurus may buy and sell securities before and after any particular article and report and information herein is published, with respect to the securities discussed in any article and report posted herein. In no event shall GuruFocus.com be liable to any member, guest or third party for any damages of any kind arising out of the use of any content or other material published or available on GuruFocus.com, or relating to the use of, or inability to use, GuruFocus.com or any content, including, without limitation, any investment losses, lost profits, lost opportunity, special, incidental, indirect, consequential or punitive damages. Past performance is a poor indicator of future performance. The information on this site, and in its related newsletters, is not intended to be, nor does it constitute, investment advice or recommendations. The information on this site is in no way guaranteed for completeness, accuracy or in any other way. The gurus listed in this website are not affiliated with GuruFocus.com, LLC.



                    Stock quotes provided by InterActive Data. Fundamental company data provided by Morningstar, updated daily.


















GF Chat {{numOfNotice}}




























×
Manage BookMarks





Close








FEEDBACK


























BBB Search Database of Businesses, Charities, & News Items

















 For full functionality of this site it is necessary to enable JavaScript.
 Here are the 
 instructions how to enable JavaScript in your web browser.
     











No results found.   Ask BBB to develop a report on this business by clicking here.


BBB Search Tips
Use BBB's search bar above to check out businesses and charities from our comprehensive database of BBB Business Profiles. Enter any of the following into the search box:

Business or Charity Name
Website URL
Phone Number
Email Address

Or, select from the categories in the drop-list to search by Type of Business or Type of Charity.
Want to know more about our rating system? Find out more here. 
Need more info?  Try the search FAQs.






















































BBB of Eastern North Carolina



























 For full functionality of this site it is necessary to enable JavaScript.
 Here are the 
 instructions how to enable JavaScript in your web browser.
     











News




07/31/17


BBB Warns Consumers About Phony Coupons



07/25/17


BBB Warns Consumers about Door-to-Door Solicitors



07/18/17


BBB Issues Warning About Local Produce Delivery Company



07/10/17


BBB Offers Tips for Finding the Perfect Summer or Track Out Camp for Kids



 More Local News »





                        FIND ACCREDITED BUSINESSES NOW.
                    












File a Complaint
GO NOW »







Auto Warranty Concerns?
FILE A CLAIM »







 LOCAL SPONSORS








Lane Plumbing







A+ Tree & Crane Services, Inc.







North Carolina Exteriors







Otto's Exteriors























































































BBB Business Profile | Issuer Direct Corp | Accreditation

























Home
 > 
Business Directory
 > 
Compliance Consulting
 > 
Issuer Direct Corp














This Business Is Not BBB Accredited



                            Is this your business? 
                                Claim it now.








Issuer Direct Corp



Submit a Review

































Issuer Direct Corp






            Business Information
        






(919) 481-4000

Issuer Direct Corp
10 years in business

        500 Perimeter Park Dr Ste D
        Morrisville, NC 27560-9638
    




                 WEBSITE
            





Find a Location






                BBB File Opened: 08/17/2010
            

                Business Started: 01/01/2007






            Business Management
        


                    Mr. Brian Balbirnie, CEO
                






            Business Category
        


                Compliance Consulting
            






            Products & Services
        
        This company offers compliance and regulator services for publicly held companies.

    




            Alternate Business Names
        


                    Direct Transfer LLC
                







                    Number of Employees: 
                
                12
            



See Less Business Information
See More Business Information


 







BBB Accreditation





                This Business Is Not BBB Accredited
            

                
                Businesses are under no obligation to seek BBB accreditation, and some businesses are not accredited because they have not sought BBB accreditation.
            

                To be accredited by BBB, a business must apply for accreditation and BBB must determine that the business meets
                BBB accreditation standards, which include a commitment to make a good faith effort to resolve any consumer complaints. BBB Accredited Businesses must pay a fee for accreditation review/monitoring and for support of BBB services to the public.
            








Standards of BBB Accreditation






Build Trust









            Establish and maintain a positive track record in the marketplace.
        

           An accredited business or organization agrees to:

                   1. Have been operational (actively selling products or services) in any BBB service area for at least the most recent 6 months, unless the principle(s) previously operated a similar business with an eligible record (one that qualifies for BBB accreditation).
                

                   1. Fulfill contracts signed and agreements reached.
                

                   3. Be free from government action that demonstrates a significant failure to support BBB ethical principles in marketplace transactions (this requires a determination by BBB as to the nature of any violation, whether it was caused or condoned by management, and actions taken to resolve underlying issues that led to the government action).
                
4. Be free of an unsatisfactory rating and maintain at least a B rating at the accrediting BBB and the BBB where it is headquartered, if different.

                   5. In its relationship with BBB: 
1. meet all applicable standards within this Code of Business Practices

                            2. cooperate with BBB's activities and efforts to promote voluntary self- regulation within the business' industry
                        
3. honor any settlements, agreements or decisions reached as an outcome of a BBB dispute resolution process

                            4. complete the required application and pay all monetary obligations to BBB in a timely manner
                        









Advertise Honestly









            Adhere to established standards of advertising and selling.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Follow federal, state/provincial and local advertising laws.
                

                    2. Abide by the BBB Code of Advertising. Supply, upon request, substantiation for advertising and selling claims. Correct advertising and selling practices, when recommended by BBB.
                
3. Adhere to applicable BBB industry codes of advertising.
4. Cooperate with BBB self-regulatory programs for the resolution of advertising disputes.
5. Use the BBB name and logos in accordance with BBB policy.

                    6. Avoid misleading customers by creating the false impression of sponsorship, endorsement, popularity, trustworthiness, product quality or business size through the misuse of logos, trustmarks, pictures, testimonials, or other means
                







Tell the Truth









            Honestly represent products and services, including clear and adequate disclosures of all material terms.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Make known all material facts in both written and verbal representations, remembering that misrepresentation may result not only from direct statements but by omitting or obscuring relevant facts.
                

                    2. Ensure that any written materials are readily available, clear, accurate and complete.
                







Be Transparent









            Openly identify the nature, location, and ownership of the business, and clearly disclose all policies, guarantees and procedures that bear on a customer's decision to buy.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Upon request, provide BBB with all information required to evaluate compliance with BBB standards. This may include, but is not limited to business name, address and contact information; names and background of principles; business and banking references; licensing and/or professional accreditation; and a complete description of the nature of the business.
                

                    2. Clearly disclose to customers:

                    
1. direct and effective means to contact the business
2. terms of any written contract
3. any guarantees or warranties accompanying a product

                            4. any restrictions or limitations imposed (e.g. limited supply,maximum number available per customer)
                        
5. the business' return/refund policy

                            6. any recurring commitment into which the customer may be entering, including information on how future billing will occur
                        
7. total cost of the transaction, including tax, shipping and handling, and other related charges



                    3. If selling products or providing services on Web sites or via other electronic means: 
1. provide any required product labeling information

                            2. disclose the nature and terms of shipping, including any known delays or shortages of stock
                        
3. provide an opportunity to review and confirm the transaction before the sale is completed

                            4. provide a receipt summarizing the transaction after the purchase
                        









Honor Promises









            Abide by all written agreements and verbal representations.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 
1. Fulfill contracts signed and agreements reached. 2. Honor representations by correcting mistakes as quickly as possible.







Be Responsive









            Address marketplace disputes quickly, professionally, and in good faith.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Promptly respond to all complaints forwarded by BBB by: 
1. Resolving the complaint directly with the complainant and notifying BBB, or

                            2. Providing BBB with a response that BBB determines: 

                                    1. is professional,
                                
2. addresses all of the issues raised by the complainant,
3. includes appropriate evidence and documents supporting the business' position, and

                                    4. explains why any relief sought by the complainant cannot or should not be granted.
                                





                    2. Make a good faith effort to resolve disputes, which includes mediation if requested by BBB. Other dispute resolution options, including arbitration, may be recommended by BBB when other efforts to resolve a dispute have failed. BBB may consider a business' willingness to participate in recommended dispute resolution options in determining compliance with these standards.
                

                    3. Comply with any settlements, agreements or decisions reached as an outcome of a BBB dispute resolution process.
                

                    4. Cooperate with BBB in efforts to eliminate the underlying cause of patterns of customer complaints that are identified by BBB.
                







Safeguard Privacy









            Protect any data collected against mishandling and fraud, collect personal information only as needed, and respect the preferences of customers regarding the use of their information.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Respect Privacy Businesses conducting e-commerce agree to disclose on their Web site the following: 
1. what information they collect,
2. with whom it is shared,
3. how it can be corrected,
4. how it is secured,

                            5. how policy changes will be communicated, and;
                        
6. how to address concerns over misuse of personal data.



                    2. Secure Sensitive Data Businesses that collect sensitive data online (credit card, bank account numbers, Social Security number, salary or other personal financial information, medical history or records, etc.) will ensure that it is transmitted via secure means.Businesses will make best efforts to comply with industry standards for the protection and proper disposal of all sensitive data, both online and offline.
                    
                

                    3. Honor Customer Preferences

                     Businesses agree to respect customer preferences regarding contact by telephone, fax and e-mail, and agree to remedy the underlying cause of any failure to do so.
                







Embody Integrity









            Approach all business dealings, marketplace transactions and commitments with integrity.
            
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to:
            
1. Avoid involvement, by the business or its principles, in activities that reflect unfavorably on, or otherwise adversely affect the public image of BBB or its accredited businesses.












BBB Accreditation Reviews

BBB routinely monitors its files on all Accredited Businesses to affirm that they continue to meet all BBB Accreditation Standards











BBB Accreditation Process


        Not every business is eligible for BBB Accreditation. Businesses must meet, commit to and maintain the
        BBB Code of Business Practices (Accreditation Standards) 
        in order to be eligible for and maintain BBB Accreditation. The BBB Code of Business Practices represents sound advertising, selling and customer
        service practices that enhance customer trust and confidence in business. The Code is built on the BBB Standards for Trust, eight principles that
        summarize important elements of creating and maintaining trust in business.
    

        In order to be eligible for Accreditation a business must complete an Accreditation application.        
    

        Upon receipt of a fully completed BBB Application for Accreditation, BBB staff:        
        
Reviews the application
Researches the business
Verifies the information presented in the application 
May request additional information
May request proof of specific information on the application

        After the review and verification process, BBB will then evaluate if the business meets the
        BBB Code of Business Practices (Accreditation Standards)..
    
    
        Once BBB has finished its evaluation, the application for BBB Accreditation is either approved or denied. If the applicant is found in compliance with the BBB Code of Business Practices it will be presented to the BBB Board of Directors, or a committee of that board, for final approval. If the application is denied, BBB will contact the applicant, indicating the BBB Standard(s) that were not met and any recourse available to the applicant.        
    
















Issuer Direct Corp






            BBB Rating Scorecard
        






This Business Is Not BBB Accredited  

                Issuer Direct Corp
            










A+




BBB Rating System Overview














Customer Review Rating:









                        The BBB Customer Review Rating represents the customer's opinion of the business.
                        The Customer Review Rating percentages are based on the total number of positive,
                        neutral, and negative reviews posted.
                    


                        There are NO reviews for this business.Be the first to leave a review!
                    



                        This business has no complaints filed
                    

















Share your experience


              Submit a Review
          

            Submit a Complaint
        











Share




Print






































































×
Claim Your Business


                By claiming your Business Profile, businesses can add custom text or descriptive information about their services, insert company logos, and add photographs for consumers to view.
            

Close










×
AccreditedQuestionModal title


                content
            

Close










×
Customer Rating Modal title


                content
            

Close










×
Score Modal title


                content
            

Close











×
Find a Location







Filter







Close




 





































 








